Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX B io      iuntur          io        
SFX B io      iunturque       io        
SFX B io      iunturne        io        
SFX B io      iunturve        io        
SFX B o       ebar            io        
SFX B o       ebarque         io        
SFX B o       ebarne          io        
SFX B o       ebarve          io        
SFX B o       ebaris          io        
SFX B o       ebarisque       io        
SFX B o       ebarisne        io        
SFX B o       ebarisve        io        
SFX B o       ebatur          io        
SFX B o       ebaturque       io        
SFX B o       ebaturne        io        
SFX B o       ebaturve        io        
SFX B o       ebamur          io        
SFX B o       ebamurque       io        
SFX B o       ebamurne        io        
SFX B o       ebamurve        io        
SFX B o       ebamini         io        
SFX B o       ebaminique      io        
SFX B o       ebaminine       io        
SFX B o       ebaminive       io        
SFX B o       ebantur         io        
SFX B o       ebanturque      io        
SFX B o       ebanturne       io        
SFX B o       ebanturve       io        
SFX B o       ar              io        
SFX B o       arque           io        
SFX B o       arne            io        
SFX B o       arve            io        
SFX B o       eris            io        
SFX B o       erisque         io        
SFX B o       erisne          io        
SFX B o       erisve          io        
SFX B o       etur            io        
SFX B o       eturque         io        
SFX B o       eturne          io        
SFX B o       eturve          io        
SFX B o       emur            io        
SFX B o       emurque         io        
SFX B o       emurne          io        
SFX B o       emurve          io        
SFX B o       emini           io        
SFX B o       eminique        io        
SFX B o       eminine         io        
SFX B o       eminive         io        
SFX B o       entur           io        
SFX B o       enturque        io        
SFX B o       enturne         io        
SFX B o       enturve         io        
SFX B o       aris            io        
SFX B o       arisque         io        
SFX B o       arisne          io        
SFX B o       arisve          io        
SFX B o       atur            io        
SFX B o       aturque         io        
SFX B o       aturne          io        
SFX B o       aturve          io        
SFX B o       amur            io        
SFX B o       amurque         io        
SFX B o       amurne          io        
SFX B o       amurve          io        
SFX B o       amini           io        
SFX B o       aminique        io        
SFX B o       aminine         io        
SFX B o       aminive         io        
SFX B o       antur           io        
SFX B o       anturque        io        
SFX B o       anturne         io        
SFX B o       anturve         io        
SFX B io      erer            io        
SFX B io      ererque         io        
SFX B io      ererne          io        
SFX B io      ererve          io        
SFX B io      ereris          io        
SFX B io      ererisque       io        
SFX B io      ererisne        io        
SFX B io      ererisve        io        
SFX B io      eretur          io        
SFX B io      ereturque       io        
SFX B io      ereturne        io        
SFX B io      ereturve        io        
SFX B io      eremur          io        
SFX B io      eremurque       io        
SFX B io      eremurne        io        
SFX B io      eremurve        io        
SFX B io      eremini         io        
SFX B io      ereminique      io        
SFX B io      ereminine       io        
SFX B io      ereminive       io        
SFX B io      erentur         io        
SFX B io      erenturque      io        
SFX B io      erenturne       io        
SFX B io      erenturve       io        
SFX B io      i               io        
SFX B io      ique            io        
SFX B io      ine             io        
SFX B io      ive             io        
SFX B o       endus           io        
SFX B o       endusque        io        
SFX B o       endusne         io        
SFX B o       endusve         io        
SFX B o       ende            io        
SFX B o       endeque         io        
SFX B o       endene          io        
SFX B o       endeve          io        
SFX B o       enda            io        
SFX B o       endaque         io        
SFX B o       endane          io        
SFX B o       endave          io        
SFX B o       endam           io        
SFX B o       endamque        io        
SFX B o       endamne         io        
SFX B o       endamve         io        
SFX B o       endae           io        
SFX B o       endaeque        io        
SFX B o       endaene         io        
SFX B o       endaeve         io        
SFX B o       endos           io        
SFX B o       endosque        io        
SFX B o       endosne         io        
SFX B o       endosve         io        
SFX B o       endorum         io        
SFX B o       endorumque      io        
SFX B o       endorumne       io        
SFX B o       endorumve       io        
SFX B o       endis           io        
SFX B o       endisque        io        
SFX B o       endisne         io        
SFX B o       endisve         io        
SFX B o       endas           io        
SFX B o       endasque        io        
SFX B o       endasne         io        
SFX B o       endasve         io        
SFX B o       endarum         io        
SFX B o       endarumque      io        
SFX B o       endarumne       io        
SFX B o       endarumve       io        
SFX B ior     ior             ior       
SFX B ior     eris            ior       
SFX B ior     erisque         ior       
SFX B ior     erisne          ior       
SFX B ior     erisve          ior       
SFX B ior     itur            ior       
SFX B ior     iturque         ior       
SFX B ior     iturne          ior       
SFX B ior     iturve          ior       
SFX B ior     imur            ior       
SFX B ior     imurque         ior       
SFX B ior     imurne          ior       
SFX B ior     imurve          ior       
SFX B ior     imini           ior       
SFX B ior     iminique        ior       
SFX B ior     iminine         ior       
SFX B ior     iminive         ior       
SFX B ior     iuntur          ior       
SFX B ior     iunturque       ior       
SFX B ior     iunturne        ior       
SFX B ior     iunturve        ior       
SFX B ior     iebar           ior       
SFX B ior     iebarque        ior       
SFX B ior     iebarne         ior       
SFX B ior     iebarve         ior       
SFX B ior     iebaris         ior       
SFX B ior     iebarisque      ior       
SFX B ior     iebarisne       ior       
SFX B ior     iebarisve       ior       
SFX B ior     iebatur         ior       
SFX B ior     iebaturque      ior       
SFX B ior     iebaturne       ior       
SFX B ior     iebaturve       ior       
SFX B ior     iebamur         ior       
SFX B ior     iebamurque      ior       
SFX B ior     iebamurne       ior       
SFX B ior     iebamurve       ior       
SFX B ior     iebamini        ior       
SFX B ior     iebaminique     ior       
SFX B ior     iebaminine      ior       
SFX B ior     iebaminive      ior       
SFX B ior     iebantur        ior       
SFX B ior     iebanturque     ior       
SFX B ior     iebanturne      ior       
SFX B ior     iebanturve      ior       
SFX B ior     iar             ior       
SFX B ior     iarque          ior       
SFX B ior     iarne           ior       
SFX B ior     iarve           ior       
SFX B ior     ieris           ior       
SFX B ior     ierisque        ior       
SFX B ior     ierisne         ior       
SFX B ior     ierisve         ior       
SFX B ior     ietur           ior       
SFX B ior     ieturque        ior       
