Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abhorreo/B
abluo/B
abripio/B
abscindo/B
absorbeo/B
abstrudo/B
accendo/B
accipio/B
acquiesco/B
adcido/B
addisco/B
adficio/B
adfluo/B
adgredior/B
adiaceo/B
adimo/B
adlego/B
admisceo/B
adnecto/B
adoleo/B
adpeto/B
adpono/B
adquiesco/B
adrideo/B
adscisco/B
adsideo/B
adstrepo/B
adstruo/B
adtexo/B
adtribuo/B
aduro/B
advesperasco/B
aequependeo/B
afficio/B
aggredior/B
aio/Bq
algeo/B
alloquor/B
alo/B
ambigo/B
amoveo/B
animaduerto/B
annecto/B
antecedo/B
antehabeo/B
appareo/B
applaudo/B
apstineo/B
arcesso/B
arefacio/B
arrigo/B
ascendo/B
aspergo/B
assero/B
assisto/B
assuesco/B
astringo/B
attendo/B
attingo/B
attribuo/B
audeo/B
augeo/B
avello/B
bibo/B
calefacio/B
candeo/B
cano/B
careo/B
cedo/B
cerno/B
circumago/B
circumcurro/B
circumfero/Bq
circumgredior/B
circumplecto/B
circumscribo/B
circumsido/B
circumvehor/B
circumvolvo/B
claresco/B
clueo/B
coarguo/B
coepio/B
cogo/B
cohibeo/B
collabor/B
collido/B
colo/B
commereo/B
commisceo/B
committo/B
como/B
compavesco/B
competo/B
complector/B
complodo/B
compraehendo/B
conbibo/B
concerpo/B
concino/B
concredo/B
concupisco/B
condeceo/B
condo/B
conficio/B
configo/B
confligo/B
confringo/B
confulgeo/B
congero/B
conicio/B
conitor/B
conlabor/B
conpello/B
conprehendo/B
conquiesco/B
conscendo/B
consenesco/B
consido/B
conspondeo/B
constringo/B
consulo/B
consurgo/B
contego/B
contero/B
contineo/B
contorqueo/B
contranitor/B
contueor/B
convalesco/B
convinco/B
corrado/B
corrigo/B
corrumpo/B
credo/B
cudo/B
decedo/B
decido/B
decoquo/B
decurro/B
deduco/B
defero/Bq
defigo/B
defluo/B
defringo/B
degredior/B
delabor/B
delicesco/B
demereo/B
demitto/B
demoveo/B
denseo/B
dependeo/B
deperdo/B
deposco/B
deprimo/B
derado/B
deripio/B
describo/B
desido/B
desisto/B
destituo/B
destruo/B
detego/B
deterreo/B
detondeo/B
detrudo/B
deturpo/B
deuro/B
devinco/B
dico/ABPS
diduco/B
diffindo/B
diffugio/B
digero/B
diiungo/B
dilucesco/B
diminuo/B
dinosco/B
diripio/B
discedo/B
discingo/B
discumbo/B
discutio/B
dispello/B
dispicio/B
dispono/B
dissero/B
dissolvo/B
distinguo/B
divello/B
divido/B
doleo/B
ebibo/B
edisco/B
edoceo/B
effervesco/B
effligo/B
effodio/B
effulgeo/B
egeo/B
egredior/B
elabor/B
eligo/B
eludo/B
emergo/B
emo/B
emoveo/B
eniteo/B
eripio/B
erumpo/B
evado/B
eveho/B
everto/B
evomo/B
exaresco/B
excedo/B
excido/B
excludo/B
excresco/B
excutio/B
exerceo/B
exigo/B
exolesco/B
expello/B
expergiscor/B
expleo/B
exporrigo/B
exprimo/B
expuo/B
exsisto/ABS
exspuo/B
extergeo/B
extraho/B
exuro/B
faveo/B
fervesco/B
flavesco/B
foveo/B
fruor/B
furo/B
glisco/B
haereo/B
humefacio/B
ignosco/B
illuceo/B
immergo/B
impello/B
impimgo/B
impono/B
incendo/B
includo/B
incurro/B
induco/B
infigo/B
infudo/B
ingravesco/B
inhaero/B
inlido/B
innotesco/B
inrumpo/B
insero/B
instinguo/B
insumo/B
intelligo/B
intercurro/B
interiacio/B
intermisceo/B
intersero/B
intremisco/B
introrumpo/B
invalesco/B
inviso/B
irruo/B
lacesso/B
lateo/B
linquo/B
ludo/B
magnifacio/B
marceo/B
meto/B
mitesco/B
morior/BS
neglego/B
noceo/B
obdo/B
obliviscor/B
obprimo/B
obsisto/B
obtego/B
obtundo/B
occino/B
offendo/B
oleo/B
opprimo/B
pando/B
parvipendo/B
patior/B
pellicio/B
percello/B
percurro/B
perficio/B
perfundo/B
perlego/B
permoveo/B
perpetior/B
persedeo/B
perstringo/B
pertraho/B
pervinco/B
plaudo/B
polliceor/B
posco/B
praebeo/B
praecido/B
praedico/ABPS
praefringo/B
praelego/B
praenosco/B
praeripio/B
praetendo/B
praeuro/B
premo/B
procumbo/B
profero/Bq
profundo/B
proicio/B
promineo/B
prorepo/B
proseco/B
prostituo/B
proveho/B
pudeo/B
quaeso/B
rarefacio/B
recipio/B
recondo/B
redigo/B
refigo/B
refugio/B
relabor/B
remaneo/B
renuo/B
repeto/B
reposco/B
rescindo/B
resorbeo/B
restituo/B
reticeo/B
retundo/B
reviso/B
rigeo/B
ruo/B
scando/B
sculpo/B
seiungo/B
sequor/B
sino/B
sperno/B
statuo/B
strideo/B
suadeo/B
subicio/B
sublabor/B
subrepo/B
subsecui/B
substituo/B
subtraho/B
succenseo/B
succurro/B
suffundo/B
superaddo/B
superincido/B
suppleo/B
suspendo/B
tango/B
tergeo/B
timeo/B
torqueo/B
traiicio/B
transduco/B
transicio/B
transscribo/B
trudo/B
tundo/B
urgeo/B
vacuefacio/B
veho/B
verto/B
vigeo/B
vivo/B
moveo/B
